Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-379
Garbage disposal plants; systems or solid waste disposal areas; purchase, construct, maintain.

Each county may purchase, construct, maintain, and improve garbage disposal plants, systems or solid waste disposal areas, and purchase equipment for the operation thereof, for the use of its inhabitants and incorporated municipalities located in such county, and may lease or take land in fee by donation, gift, devise, purchase or appropriation for rights-of-way, for the construction and operation of such a disposal plant, system or solid waste disposal areas. Each county may also make and enter into a contract or contracts with any person, firm, or corporation for the construction, maintenance, or operation of a garbage disposal plant, system or solid waste disposal area.

Laws 1967, c. 112, § 1, p. 360;

Laws 1969, c. 163, § 1, p. 737;

Laws 1979, LB 22, § 1.

For joint management of solid waste, see the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, section 13-2001.